Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-186
Open market, defined.

Open market means a sales barn, market agency, stockyard, packing plant, or terminal market located outside of the brand inspection area or located outside of this state where brand inspection is maintained either by employees of the Nebraska Brand Committee or by some other state under a reciprocal agreement as allowed under the federal Packers and Stockyards Act, 1921, 7 U.S.C. 181 et seq., as amended.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 17.